District of Columbia statutes.
6-1406.02

Compliance letter fees.

The Office of Zoning Administrator administrative fee for the issuance of compliance letters shall be as follows:

(1)

Zoning compliance letter for a single lot: $25.

(2)

Zoning compliance letter for all other requests: $100.

History

Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 7b
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2021(b), 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2021(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2021(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).